Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6630XS (7) 91 da/js S.F. 2264 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 459.311F Manure management planning 1 map. 2 1. The department shall prepare and publish on its internet 3 site a manure management planning map to assist a person 4 applying manure originating from an animal feeding operation. 5 2. The manure management planning map shall be part of an 6 interactive computer program. The map shall be in the form of 7 a digital dynamic map that incorporates geographic information 8 system technology in a manner that allows a user to immediately 9 identify areas that are vulnerable to pollution caused by 10 manure application due to one or more factors identified by the 11 department, including but not limited to any of the following: 12 a. Terrain, including karst terrain, and topography. 13 b. The effect of climatic conditions. 14 c. The proximity to a designated area or a water source, 15 including a high-quality water resource. 16 d. A field that is included in more than one manure 17 management plan or nutrient management plan as provided in 18 section 459A.208. If manure, including open feedlot effluent, 19 originating from more than one animal feeding operation is to 20 be applied to a field, the map shall indicate the months during 21 which the manure from that animal feeding operation is to be 22 applied to that field. 23 3. The manure management planning map shall be designed to 24 assist a person to apply manure in the most efficient practical 25 manner possible while reducing risks associated with runoff, 26 including by adjusting application rates and timing. 27 Sec. 2. Section 459.312, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 28 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A verification that the person consults 30 the manure management planning map as provided in section 31 459.311F prior to application. 32 Sec. 3. Section 459A.208, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 33 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A verification that the person consults 35 -1- LSB 6630XS (7) 91 da/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2264 the manure management planning map as provided in section 1 459.311F prior to application. 2